Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 4 Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System
24-4-510. Eligibility for benefits — Deferred and early annuities.

Any member or former member with sufficient years of actual service to qualify for a vested termination annuity who has not attained his or her normal retirement age may retire with an early annuity provided for in subsection (b) of this section upon his or her written application to the plan setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of his or her application, he or she desires to be retired.

The member or former member eligible for a vested termination annuity must have at least five (5) years of actual service and be within ten (10) years of normal retirement age, except for members of the General Assembly who must have at least ten (10) years of actual service and be within ten (10) years of normal retirement age.

Upon early retirement, a member shall receive a certain percentage of an annuity for life provided for in § 24-4-601. The percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by one-half of one percent (0.5%) multiplied by the number of months by which the member's age at early retirement is younger than his or her normal retirement age, using what his or her normal retirement age would have been under the provisions of § 24-4-508 if he or she had continued covered employment from the time of early retirement.

However, if the member or former member has at least twenty-five (25) years of actual service but less than twenty-eight (28) years of actual service and has not reached age sixty-five (65), then upon early retirement the member shall receive a percentage of a life annuity as provided in § 24-4-601. The percentage shall be one hundred percent (100%) reduced by one percent (1%) multiplied by the number of months by which the time of early retirement precedes the earlier of either the completion of twenty-eight (28) years of actual service or the attainment of age sixty-five (65).

If the reduction set forth under this subdivision (a)(2)(B) is greater than the reduction that would have otherwise been imposed except for this subdivision (a)(2)(B), then the lesser reduction shall apply.

The early annuity shall be effective the first day of the calendar month next following the later of termination of public employer employment or thirty (30) days after receipt by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System of the written application.

A member who terminates covered employment before attaining his or her normal retirement age for a reason other than death or early retirement or disability retirement shall be entitled to an annuity computed in accordance with the provisions of subdivision (b)(2) of this section as it provides at time of last termination of employment, subject to the member's satisfying all of the following conditions:

Except for members of the General Assembly, who must have at least ten (10) years of actual service, the member has five (5) or more years of total actual service with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or in combination with reciprocal systems under the provisions of §§ 24-2-401 — 24-2-405, and 24-2-407. In establishing the minimum total credited service, periods of credited service covering the same calendar time shall be counted only one (1) time. However, both service in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System as a member of the General Assembly and service in another reciprocal system during the same period of time may be counted to meet the service requirements for benefits from the reciprocal systems, subject to the following:

The provisions of § 24-4-521 may not be used to meet the service requirements; and

The benefit payable by a reciprocal system will be based on the credited service in that system and on the final average compensation under that system;

If a member has fewer years of service than the final average compensation requirement in a reciprocal system, then “final average compensation” means the monthly average of pay to the member during his or her total years of service in that system;

The member lives to his or her annuity starting date; and

The member makes written application for retirement in accordance with this section.

A contributory member with twenty (20) or more years of actual service who left or leaves the employ of a public employer prior to the member's attainment of age sixty (60) for any reason except his or her retirement or death shall be entitled to an annuity provided for in § 24-4-601, but only if the member does not withdraw his or her accumulated contributions from the members' deposit account.

The member's annuity shall begin the first day of the calendar month next following the month after his or her attainment of age sixty (60) upon written application filed with the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing of the application, the member desires to be retired.

A contributory member who has at least five (5) years but less than twenty (20) years of actual service who leaves the employ of a public employer prior to his or her attainment of age sixty-five (65) for any reason except his or her retirement or death and who does not withdraw his or her accumulated contributions from the members' deposit account shall be entitled to an annuity provided for in § 24-4-606.

A noncontributory member who has at least five (5) years but less than twenty-eight (28) years of actual service who leaves the employ of a public employer prior to the attainment of age sixty-five (65) for any reason except retirement or death shall be entitled to an annuity provided for in § 24-4-606.

The member's annuity shall begin the first day of the calendar month next following the month of attainment of age sixty-five (65) upon written application filed with the board setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, the member desired to be retired.

The monthly amount of vested termination annuity shall be computed in the same manner as a normal annuity amount provided for in § 24-4-601, but it shall be based upon the member's credited service and final average compensation at the time of termination of employment covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The member shall have the right to elect an option provided for in § 24-4-606.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1959, No. 42, § 10; 1965, No. 153, § 8; 1973, No. 586, § 3; 1975, No. 907, § 14; 1979, No. 715, § 3; 1985, No. 938, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510; Acts 1999, No. 627, § 2; 2001, No. 151, § 24; 2001, No. 1297, § 1.

24-4-511. Eligibility for benefits — Disability retirement — Definitions.

Except for members of the General Assembly who need at least ten (10) years of actual service, any active member with five (5) or more years of actual service, including actual service for at least eighteen (18) of the twenty-four (24) calendar months immediately preceding his or her disability, who becomes totally and permanently physically or mentally incapacitated for any suitable job or position as an employee as a result of a personal injury or disease may be retired by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System upon written application filed with the board by or on behalf of the member.

As used in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(i) of this section, “disease” includes without limitation cancer that a firefighter or volunteer firefighter is diagnosed with while he or she is in the line of duty.

A finding that a firefighter or volunteer firefighter was diagnosed with cancer while he or she was in the line of duty may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

As used in subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii) of this section, “cancer” means:

Leukemia, lymphoma, mesothelioma, or multiple myeloma;

Cancer of the brain, urinary tract, liver, skin, breast, cervix, thyroid, prostate, testicle, colon, or digestive tract; or

A cancer that has been found by research and statistics to show higher instances of occurrence in firefighters than in the general population, if the firefighter was exposed to a known carcinogen, as determined by the Department of Health with consideration to the findings of the International Agency for Research on Cancer, while in the official line of duty.

This may occur only if after a medical examination of the member made by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board, the physician reports to the board in writing that the member is physically or mentally totally incapacitated for any suitable job or position, that the incapacity will probably be permanent, and that the member should be retired.

Upon filing the proper application and meeting the requirements stated in this section, the disability annuity shall be effective the first day of the calendar month following the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's approval of the disability application.

Upon disability retirement as provided in subsection (a) of this section, a member shall receive an annuity provided for in § 24-4-601, and his or her disability retirement and annuity shall be subject to the provisions of subsections (c) and (d) of this section.

When a person retired on disability under this chapter reaches the age required for full age and service retirement benefits, the person's retirement status shall be changed from that of disability to superannuation.

A person who receives or who is receiving a benefit solely because of disability but who meets or has met the elected credited service and total credited service requirement but not the age requirement for a benefit provided for a member with elected service, upon attaining the required age, may have his or her disability retirement status changed to superannuation.

The person's benefit shall be the age and service amount provided by his or her credited service in effect before termination of employment because of disability.

The change must be made by formal request of the retirant to the board on a form to be furnished by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and filed with the system setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the execution and filing thereof, he or she desires the change to be effective.

In no event shall the change be effective earlier than the first of the month following attainment of the age required for the age and service benefit provided by his or her amount of credited service, and, after the effective date, he or she shall be eligible to return to employment subject to the provisions of § 24-4-520.

At least one (1) time each year during the first five (5) years following a member's retirement on account of disability and at least one (1) time in each three-year period thereafter, the board may require any disability retirant who has not attained the normal retirement age for full age and service retirement benefits to undergo a medical examination to be made by or under the direction of a physician or physicians designated by the board.

If a retirant refuses to submit to a medical examination in any period, his or her disability annuity may be suspended by the board until his or her withdrawal of the refusal.

If the refusal continues for one (1) year, all of the retirant's rights in and to a disability annuity may be revoked by the board.

If, upon the medical examination of the retirant, the physician reports to the board that the retirant is physically and mentally able and capable for a suitable job or position as an employee, his or her disability retirement shall terminate.

If a disability retirant secures employment with an employer not considered a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, for the purpose of determining whether he or she is capable of returning to employment, then the disability retirant shall be allowed to earn compensation from the employment for a period of time not to exceed nine (9) months, during which period of time the retirant shall receive no monthly benefits from the system.

If the retirant becomes unable to continue his or her employment before the nine-month period expires, then the retirant's disability retirement benefits from the system shall be reinstated and shall be effective the first day of the month after terminating his or her employment.

Only one (1) trial work period is allowed any disability retirant, but the nine (9) months need not be consecutive.

The trial work period does not prevent the consideration of any medical evidence which may demonstrate recovery before the ninth month of trial work.

If at the end of the nine-month trial work period the retirant wishes to continue his or her employment outside the system, then the retirant's disability retirement status shall terminate. For the purpose of determining his or her eligibility for any other benefit, the retirant shall be considered to have terminated active membership as of the time of disability retirement but for a reason other than disability or death.

If the former disability retirant again becomes an employee of a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, the retirant shall immediately again become a member of the system, his or her credited service at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be restored to the retirant's credit, and the amount of his or her accumulated contributions at the time of his or her disability retirement shall be restored to his or her credit in the members' deposit account.

In no event shall the retirant be given service credit for the period he or she was in receipt of the disability annuity.

Should the former disability retirant again become totally and permanently disabled within twenty-four (24) months immediately following his or her return to membership or should the retirant qualify for benefits by reason of age and service, the eighteen (18) months' credited service requirement specified in this section shall be waived.

As used in this section, “suitable job or position” means a job or position, the requirements of which can be physically or mentally performed, as determined by a physician, and for which the remuneration would be substantially gainful.

In case of doubt as to what would be substantially gainful, the board shall have the final power to decide the question.

Any former member who is or was approved for disability by the Social Security Administration but whose onset date does not meet the provision of subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section that requires credited service for eighteen (18) of the twenty-four (24) months immediately preceding the disability, may be retired by the board upon written application to the board subject to the following:

The onset date determined by the Social Security Administration is within twenty-four (24) months of the date of termination from covered employment;

The former member furnishes a written statement to the board from a physician approved by the board that the former member was suffering at the time of termination from an illness or injury that subsequently led to the disability determination; and

Retirement payments authorized under this section shall be effective on the first day of the next month following approval by the board of the written application and shall not be retroactive.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1959, No. 42, § 10; 1973, No. 586, § 4; 1975, No. 907, § 8; 1977, No. 663, § 3; 1981, No. 859, § 4; 1985, No. 448, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510; Acts 1999, No. 325, § 8; 1999, No. 868, § 3; 2001, No. 151, § 25; 2013, No. 332, § 9; 2019, No. 638, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment substituted “Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System's approval of the disability application” for “later of either the member's termination of active membership or the onset date of the qualifying disability” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment redesignated (a)(1)(A) as (a)(1)(A)(i), and added (a)(1)(A)(ii) and (a)(1)(A)(iii).

24-4-512. Eligibility for benefits — Prior service credit for county members.

Any member of the County Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may, upon application and submission of proper proof to the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, receive credit for any service rendered a public employer, as defined in § 24-4-101, prior to July 1, 1959, subject to the following conditions:

That he or she was employed by a county participating public employer on July 1, 1957; and

That he or she was employed by a state department participating public employer on July 1, 1959.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 177, § 10; 1967, No. 175, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2510.

24-4-513. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the minimum period of service for the payment of benefits, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 151, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1957, No. 177, § 14; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2514.

24-4-514. Credit for educational leave.

As used in this section:

“Educational leave” means a leave of absence from employment in a position covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to pursue a degree from an institution of higher education; and

“System” means the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

On or after July 1, 1987, any person who is a member of the system and who is not receiving benefits under the system on July 1, 1987, shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed twelve (12) months for actual time spent on educational leave, provided that the person:

Has ten (10) or more years of actual service with the system;

Was paid a stipend during the period of educational leave;

Had creditable service before and for at least two (2) years after the period of educational leave; and

Pays or causes to be paid the sum of all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member of the system during that period of time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date of the educational leave to the date the payment is received by the system.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 33, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 299, § 16; 2001, No. 151, § 27.

24-4-515. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning credit for lost credited service due to physical injury or disabling disease, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 299, § 26. The section was derived from Acts 1995, No. 882, § 1.

24-4-516. Credit for lost credited service due to work-related injury.

Any member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who suffers from or who has suffered in the past from a work-related injury for which workers' compensation benefits were paid under the workers' compensation laws, and whose annuity from the system would otherwise be reduced due to the reduced salary and lost credited service, shall be entitled to obtain credited service for the actual time period of reduced salary and lost service credit by paying to the system all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member of the system during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service would have been rendered to the date the payment is received by the system.

Provided, however, at the discretion of the employer, any employer under the system may elect to implement a policy to pay the employer's portion of any contributions that an employee would otherwise be responsible to pay under this section to receive the service credit.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 962, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 17.

24-4-517. State service under a federal grant — Definition.

As used in this section, “state service under a federal grant” means service rendered to any state agency while detailed or assigned to the agency under the terms of a federal grant agreement between an agency of the federal government and a state agency to perform services for the state agency and to be under the supervision of state administrators while being paid from federal grant funds awarded to the state agency and withheld from the federal grant moneys.

From and after January 1, 1995, any person who is or was a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall be entitled to purchase credited service in the system for a period not to exceed three (3) years for state service under a federal grant, but only if the person:

Has at least ten (10) years of actual service with the system;

Is not receiving or was not eligible to receive any retirement benefits paid by another retirement system for the period of time for which he or she is claiming state service under a federal grant, except for Social Security benefits, if the person had left on deposit the contributions to the other system;

Pays or causes to be paid all employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member of the system during that time, all employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time, and regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date payment is received by the system.

The member may purchase all of the service or any portion thereof in multiples of one (1) year.

The payment of funds shall be made in one (1) lump sum; and

Has otherwise complied with all other rules as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System may from time to time adopt under this section.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1264, § 1; 1997, No. 239, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 18; 2001, No. 151, § 28; 2019, No. 315, § 2857.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (b)(4).

24-4-518. Credit for service as sheriff.

A sheriff or former sheriff who became a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System pursuant to Acts 1995, No. 846, § 1, may purchase his or her time as an elected sheriff prior to July 28, 1995. At his or her option, the sheriff or former sheriff may receive credit for the service, subject to the following conditions:

The person is a participating employee covered under the system at the time of the purchase or was a sheriff who became a member pursuant to Acts 1995, No. 846, § 1;

The person furnishes proof in a form required by the system of the service and compensation received;

The person pays or causes to be paid:

All employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time;

All employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time; and

Regular interest on the employee and employer contributions. The interest shall be computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the system. The person may purchase all of the service or any portion thereof in multiples of one (1) year; and

The payment of funds shall be made in one (1) lump sum.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 870, § 1; 2001, No. 151, § 29.

24-4-519. Current service credit — Nonuniformed employees.

A person who on December 31, 1998, was a nonuniformed employee of a municipality that participates in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or a former nonuniformed employee of a municipality that participates in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System who was an active member of the system on December 31, 1998, may waive all rights to receive benefits under § 24-12-101 et seq. and apply for and receive current service credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service rendered as a paid nonuniformed employee of the municipality.

A former nonuniformed employee of a municipality or municipalities who had at least six (6) years of service as a nonuniformed employee, ten (10) years of service as a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or a reciprocal system as defined by § 24-2-401, and is in a position of policy-making authority for a state agency may waive all rights to receive benefits for the service under any retirement plan and apply for and receive current service credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service rendered as a paid nonuniformed employee of the municipality or municipalities.

A former nonuniformed employee whose employment was with a municipality not participating in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, whose employment accrued before January 1, 1970, and who was an active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or a reciprocal system as defined by § 24-2-401 on December 31, 1998, may waive all rights to receive benefits under § 24-12-101 et seq., and apply for and receive current service credit in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System for service rendered as a paid nonuniformed employee of the municipality.

The waiver must be filed with the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and with the governing body of the municipality.

The current or former paid nonuniformed employee shall receive credit only if the employee or the municipality pays or causes to be paid to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System Fund:

All necessary employee contributions at the rate and on the compensation that would have been paid had the employee been a member during that time;

All employer contributions based on the employer normal cost from the most recently completed regular annual actuarial valuation and the compensation that would have been paid had he or she been a member during that time; and

Regular interest on the employee and employer contributions computed from the date the service was rendered to the date the payment is received by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

The employer's contributions and employees' contributions, if applicable, shall be transmitted to the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in the form and manner, together with the supporting data, as the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall prescribe from time to time.

The governing body of the municipality may pay the employer contributions and employee contributions, if applicable, on behalf of the employee for services rendered.

“Paid nonuniformed employees” has the same meaning as provided by § 24-12-101.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 706, § 1.

24-4-520. Termination required for retirement.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall terminate covered employment to be eligible for retirement.

A member shall not be terminated from employment for retirement purposes if the person:

Returns to employment in a position covered under the system within one hundred eighty (180) days of the person's effective date of retirement; or

Is a member with service credit under § 24-4-521 at a rate of two (2) or more years of credited service for each year of actual service and the person returns to employment in a position covered under the system within one (1) year of the person's effective date of retirement.

A member participating in the Arkansas Public Employees’ Retirement System Deferred Retirement Option Plan on January 1, 2009, shall have the one-hundred-eighty-day separation requirement waived and may return to employment otherwise covered by the system no sooner than thirty (30) calendar days from the commencement of his or her retirement.

A member who has retired and commenced receiving benefits in any month between January 2009 and June 2009, inclusive, shall have the one-hundred-eighty-day separation requirement waived and may return to employment otherwise covered by the system no sooner than thirty (30) calendar days from the commencement of his or her retirement.

An elected public official may retire and begin receiving retirement benefits if the elected public official is a member:

Whose current service in public office in one (1) form of government is covered by § 24-4-521(b)(5); and

Who is elected to public office in a different form of government and will begin serving in that public office immediately after the expiration of his or her term of public office described in subdivision (c)(1)(A) of this section.

The member shall notify the retirement system of his or her impending service in another form of government at least thirty (30) days prior to the first day of the month in which that service will begin. A completed retirement application shall be submitted at that time.

As used in this subsection, “form of government” means city government, county government, or state government.

Persons failing to meet termination requirements shall forfeit their benefits until requirements are met.

As used in this section, “terminate” means:

The member's employment has ended;

A complete severance of the employer-employee relationship has occurred; and

The member has ceased performing any services for the employer, except for noncompensated functions related to the transfer of the duties or the transfer of the position itself.

If the member is an elected public official, “terminate” as used in this section means:

The member has resigned, been removed, or otherwise no longer holds the elected position;

A complete severance from the elected position has occurred; and

The member has ceased performing any services in his or her elected position, except for noncompensated functions related to the transfer of the duties or the transfer of the position itself.

As used in this section, “terminate” does not mean:

Taking a leave of absence;

Performing job duties or services without remuneration; or

Receiving or accruing additional employment-related compensation, reimbursements, benefits, or other emoluments.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1460, § 1; 2001, No. 154, § 1; 2005, No. 652, § 1; 2009, No. 657, §
1; 2011, No. 40, § 1; 2011, No. 774, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 652, § 2, provided:

“Section 1

of this act shall apply retroactively to an elected public official who meets the requirements of § 24-4-520(c) as of January 1, 2005.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment redesignated (b), substituted “one hundred eighty (180)” for “thirty (30)” in (b)(1)(A), substituted “one hundred eighty (180)” for “ninety (90)” in (b)(1)(B), and inserted (b)(2) and (b)(3).

The 2011 amendment by No. 40 added (e).

The 2011 amendment by No. 774 substituted “one (1) year” for “one hundred eighty (180) days” in (b)(1)(B).

24-4-521. Credited service generally — Definition.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall establish the amounts of service to be credited its members subject to the provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

Noncontributory employment service by a person who was:

Employed prior to July 1, 1997, as a public safety member shall be credited at one and one-half (1½) times the regular rate for crediting service; and

Employed on and after July 1, 1997, shall be credited at the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i)(a) or subdivision (b)(1)(A)(i)(b) of this section shall be required to have five (5) years of actual service to meet the:

Retirement eligibility requirements under §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

Eligibility requirements for payment upon death benefits under § 24-4-608.

Noncontributory or contributory employment service by a person who qualifies as a public safety member under § 24-4-1004 shall be credited at one and one-half (1½) times the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be required to have five (5) years of actual service to meet the:

Retirement eligibility requirements under §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

Eligibility requirements of § 24-4-608.

Noncontributory employment as the Governor by a person first elected to a public office covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System prior to July 1, 1999, shall be credited as service at three (3) times the regular rate for credited service.

Noncontributory or contributory employment as the Governor by a person first elected to a public office covered by the system on or after July 1, 1999, shall be credited at the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(2)(A)(i) or subdivision (b)(2)(A)(ii) of this section shall be required to have:

Four (4) years of actual service to meet the retirement eligibility requirements under §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

Five (5) years of actual service to meet the eligibility requirements for payment upon death benefits under § 24-4-608.

Noncontributory employment as an elected state constitutional officer by a person first elected to a public office covered by the system prior to July 1, 1999, shall be credited at two and one-half (2½) times the regular rate for crediting service.

Noncontributory or contributory employment as an elected state constitutional officer by a person first elected to a public office covered by the system on or after July 1, 1999, shall be credited at the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(3)(A)(i) or subdivision (b)(3)(A)(ii) of this section shall be required to have five (5) years of actual service to meet the:

Retirement eligibility requirements under §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

Eligibility requirements for payment of death benefits under § 24-4-608.

Noncontributory or contributory employment as a member of the General Assembly shall be credited at the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(4)(A)(i) of this section shall be required to have:

Ten (10) years of credited service to meet the retirement eligibility requirements of §§ 24-4-510, 24-4-511, and 24-4-609;

Five (5) years of actual service to meet the eligibility requirements for the payment upon death benefits under § 24-4-608; and

Five (5) years of actual service to be eligible to purchase military service credit under § 24-2-502.

A member of the General Assembly who at any time has served at least six (6) months in the General Assembly shall be credited with no more than one (1) year's actual service.

A person who is employed as an elected public official covered by the system and:

Who has served in a noncontributory elected position covered by the system before July 1, 2011, shall be credited as service at two (2) times the regular rate for crediting service;

Who has never served in a noncontributory elected position covered by the system before July 1, 2011, shall be credited as service at two (2) times the regular rate for crediting service, and the employee shall contribute an additional two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the gross payroll, and the employer shall contribute an additional two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the gross payroll for the additional service that exceeds the regular rate of service; or

Who has never served in a contributory elected position covered by the system before January 1, 2014, shall be credited as service at two (2) times the regular rate for crediting service, and the employee shall contribute an additional two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the gross payroll, and the employer shall contribute an additional two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the gross payroll for the additional service that exceeds the regular rate of service.

However, at least five (5) years of actual service shall be required to meet:

The retirement eligibility requirements of §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

The eligibility requirements of § 24-4-608.

This subdivision (b)(5) does not apply to:

The Governor;

An elected state constitutional officer;

A member of the General Assembly; or

An elected public official under the State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

Noncontributory employment as an elected public official under the state division of the system other than the Governor, an elected state constitutional officer, or a member of the General Assembly by a person first elected to a public office covered by the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System prior to July 1, 1999, shall be credited as service at two (2) times the regular rate for crediting service.

A person receiving credit for service under subdivision (b)(6)(A)(i) of this section shall have five (5) years of actual service to meet the:

Retirement eligibility requirements under §§ 24-4-510 — 24-4-512 and 24-4-601; and

Eligibility requirements for payment upon death benefits under § 24-4-608.

Noncontributory or contributory employment as an elected public official under the state division of the system other than the Governor, an elected state constitutional officer, or a member of the General Assembly by a person first elected to a public office covered by the system on or after July 1, 1999, shall be credited at the regular rate for crediting service.

As used in this section, “elected state constitutional officer” means the Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, Secretary of State, Auditor of State, Treasurer of State, and Commissioner of State Lands.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 151, § 30; 2011, No. 563, § 1; 2011, No. 978, § 3; 2013, No. 288, § 1; 2019, No. 826, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The State Division of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, referred to in this section, may no longer exist as a separate division of the system. For present organizational structure of the system, see § 24-4-201.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment by No. 563 subdivided former (b)(5) as (b)(5)(A) and (B) and added (b)(5)(C); substituted “covered by the system and” for “other than Governor or an elected state constitutional officer or a member of the General Assembly or an elected public official under the state division of the system” in the introductory paragraph of (b)(5)(A); inserted “Who has served in an elected position covered by the system before July 1, 2011” in (b)(5)(A)(i); added (b)(5)(A)(ii); and deleted “at least five (5) years of actual service shall be required to meet” at the beginning of (b)(5)(B)(ii).

The 2011 amendment by No. 978 inserted the (b)(1)(A) designation and (b)(1)(B).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (b)(1)(A)(ii), (b)(1)(B)(ii), (b)(2)(B), (b)(3)(B), (b)(4)(A), and (b)(6)(A);
inserted “or contributory” throughout the section; deleted “during a two-year term” following “months” in (b)(4)(B); substituted “A person who is employed” for “Noncontributory employment” in (b)(5)(A); and added (b)(5)(A)(iii).

The 2019 amendment substituted “credited” for “actual” in (b)(4)(A)(ii)

(a)

; and added (b)(4)(A)(ii)

(c)